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DI−1 98 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
S Using SST 09843−18020, connect the terminals Tc and E

1 
of check connector.

S If any abnormality is not found when inspecting parts, inspect the ECU.
S If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed that code. For details

of each code, turn to the page referred to under the ”See page” for respective ”DTC No.” in the DTC
chart.

DTC chart of ABS:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C0278 / 11
(DI−218)

Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
SABSsolenoid rela y

C0279 / 12
(DI−218)

B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit

SABS solenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0226 /21
(DI−215)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRRorSFRHcircuit

C0236 /22
(DI−215)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLRorSFLHcircuit

C0246 /23
(DI−215)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRRRorSRRHcircuit

C0256 /24
(DI−215)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRLRorSRLHcircuit

C1225 /25
(DI−233)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA1circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1circuit

C1226 /26
(DI−233)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA2circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

C1227 /27
(DI−233)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakebooster
solenoidcircuit (SA3circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA3circuit

C1228 /28
(DI−233)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(STRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSTRcircuit

C0200 /31*
1

(DI−208)
Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C0205 /32*
1

(DI−208)
Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor

E h d i i t
C0210 /33*

1

(DI−208)
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0215 /34*
1

(DI−208)
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C1235 / 35
(DI−208)

Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the right front sensor
SRight front, left front, ri ght rea r, left rea r speedsensor

C1236 / 36
(DI−208)

Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left front sensor

SRight front , left front , right rear ,left rear speedsensor
SSpeedsensor rotor

C1237 / 37
(DI−247)

Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size

C1238 / 38
(DI−208)

Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the right rear sensor
SRight front, left front, ri ght rea r, left rea r speedsensor

C1239 / 39
(DI−208)

Foreign matter is attached on the tip of the left rear sensor

SRight front , left front , right rear ,left rear speedsensor
SSpeed sensor rotor
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C1241 / 41
(DI−248)

Low battery voltage or abnormally high battery voltage
S Battery
S IC regulator
S Power source circuit

C1242 / 42*
2

(DI−251)
Open circuit in IG2 circuit

S Battery
S IC regulator
S Power source circuit

C1243 / 43
(DI−254)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output)
S Deceleration sensor
S Wire harness for deceleration sensor system

C1244 / 44
(DI−258)

Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit
S Deceleration sensor
S Deceleration sensor circuit

C1245 / 45
(DI−254)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
S Deceleration sensor
S Wire harness for deceleration sensor system

C1246 / 46
(DI−261)

Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor
S Master cylinder pressure sensor
S Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit

C1249 / 49
(DI−264)

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit

C1251 / 51*
2

(DI−268)
Pump motor is locked
Open circuit in pump motor ground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1252 / 52*
2

(DI−271)
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)

C1253 / 53*
2

(DI−277)
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

S ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay
S ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay circuit
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

C1254 / 54*
2

(DI−282)
Pressure switch malfunction

S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Pressure switch circuit

C1256 / 56*
2

(DI−285)
Accumulator low pressure malfunction

S Accumulator
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1257 / 57*
2

(DI−291)
Power supply drive circuit malfunction

S Battery
S Power source circuit
S Skid control ECU

C1203 / 59
(DI−225)

Engine and ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction
S TRC+ or TRC− circuit
S ENG+ or ENG− circuit
S Engine and ECT ECU

C1268 / 68
(DI−294)

Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure
S Transfer L4 position switch
STransferL4positionswitchcircuit

Always ON
(DI−307)

Malfunction in skid control ECU

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
SSkidcontrolECU

*
1
:As theDTCcannotbeerasedby replacingpartsalonedoeitherof the followingoperations.

Clear DTC (See page DI−185).
At the vehicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. or more.



ECU

Powersource*

Hydraulicbrakebooster

Motor relay circuit

Accumulator malfunction

Pumpmotorcircuit

Pressureswitch PH

PL

Pump motor

MTTwireharness

MT+ wire harness
MT− wireharness

MR1 open circuit

MR2 open circuit

MR1 welded contact

MR2 welded contact

Pressure leaks

IG2opencircuit
Power supply circuit

Light Buzzer Light Light Light Light Light LightBuzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer

DTC

BRAKEwarning lightandbuzzer

42 51 52 53 54 56 57

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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*
2
:Using the following table, troubledpartscanbespecified.
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DTC chart of VSC:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C1231 / 31
(DI−236)

Malfunction in steering angle sensor
SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit

C1232 / 32
(DI−241)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1233 / 33
(DI−244)

Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1234 / 34
(DI−244)

Malfunction in yaw rate sensor
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1335 / 35
(DI−236)

Malfunction in steering angle sensor communication circuit
SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit

C1210 / 36
(DI−300)

Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit
SNeutral start switchcircuit (P range)

C1336 / 39
(DI−300)

Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit
SNeutral start switch (P range)circuit

C1289 / 41*
(DI−230)

Malfunction in VGRS control system VGRS control system

C1223 / 43
(DI−230)

Malfunction in ABS control system ABS control system

C1224 / 44
(DI−231)

Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit
SNEOcircuit
SEngineandECTECU
SSkidcontrolECU

C1340 / 47
(DI−303)

Open circuit in center differential lock signal
SCenterdifferential locksystem
SCenterdifferential lockcircuit

C1291 / 48*
(DI−225)

VGRS ECU communication circuit malfunction
SVSC+orVSC − circuit
SAFS+orAFS − circuit
SEngineandECTECU

C1201 / 51
(DI−224)

Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system

C1203 / 53
(DI−225)

EngineandECTECUcommunicationcircuitmalfunction
STRC+orTRC − circuit
SENG+orENG − circuit

SEngineandECTECU

AlwaysON
(DI−310)

Malfunction inskidcontrolECU
Opencircuit inVSCTRCwarning lightcircuit

SPowersourcecircuit
SVSCTRCwarning lightcircuit

*: w/ VGRS only
HINT:
There isacase thathand −held testercannotbeusedwhenVSCTRCwarning light isalwayson.


